Wyoming, session 2025, HB0335.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-9-301 through 21-9-306 are created
to read:

ARTICLE 3
WYOMING EDUCATIONAL RELIGIOUS FREEDOM ACT

HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727
21-9-301. Wyoming educational religious freedom act.

This act may be cited as the "Wyoming Educational Religious
Freedom Act."

21-9-302. Legislative findings.

(a) The Wyoming legislature finds that:

(i) Article 1, section 19 and article 7, section
12 of the Wyoming constitution prohibit sectarian
instruction in public schools;

(ii) Certain educational frameworks and
practices constitute sectarian instruction through:

(A) Establishment of comprehensive belief
systems;

(B) Implementation of mandatory ritual-like
practices;

HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727
(C) Imposition of specific moral ethical
frameworks;

(D) Creation of hierarchical authority
structures for moral guidance;

(E) Required acceptance and practice of
specific worldviews;

(F) Mandatory participation in belief-based
activities.

(iii) The state has the following compelling
government interests:

(A) Protecting students' rights of
conscience;

(B) Maintaining religious neutrality in
public education;

(C) Ensuring parents' rights in directing
their children's education;
HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727

(D) Preservice academic freedom while
preventing compelling speech;

(E) Upholding the Wyoming constitution
prohibiting sectarian instruction in public schools;

(F) Protecting the freedom of religion
provided by the first amendment to the United States
constitution;

(G) Maintaining educational quality;

(H) Respecting diverse community values.

(iv) The Wyoming Educational Religious Freedom
Act is narrowly tailored to achieve the compelling
government interests outlined in paragraph (iii) of this
subsection.

21-9-303. Definitions.

(a) "Educational institution" means:
HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727

(i) Any public school;

(ii) Any public school district;

(iii) Any program or activity receiving state
educational funds;

(iv) Any entity providing educational services
under contract with the state.

(b) "Sectarian" includes any pedagogical framework,
practice or instruction that:

(i) Mandates specific beliefs about human
development, identity or social interaction;

(ii) Requires participation in activities
involving emotional or personal disclosure;

(iii) Enforces particular viewpoints about power
structures, privilege or group identity;

HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727
(iv) Establishes predetermined moral frameworks
about social or cultural dynamics;

(v) Requires acceptance of specific theories
about systemic or institution structures;

(vi) Mandates participation in exercises focused
on identity exploration or recognition;

(vii) Implements compulsory training or
activities regarding cultural competency or bias;

(viii) Requires adherence to prescribed methods
of discussing or analyzing group identity;

(ix) Establishes specific frameworks for
emotional processing or social interaction;

(x) Mandates acceptance of particular historical
interpretations based on group identity.

21-9-304. Prohibited practices; authorized practices.

HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727
(a) No educational institution shall implement or
incorporate curricula, instruction, training or programming
that:

(i) Requires students to:

(A) Participate in mandatory emotional
disclosure or processing activities;

(B) Accept specific beliefs about power
dynamics or privilege;

(C) Engage in compulsory identity
exploration or recognition;

(D) Adopt particular viewpoints about
social or cultural structure;

(E) Follow prescribed methods for
discussing group identity;

(F) Accept specific historical
interpretations based on group identity;
HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727

(G) Participate in mandatory cultural
competency or bias recognition activities.

(ii) Establishes or enforces:

(A) Equity-based or identity-based grading
systems;

(B) Mandatory identity-focused group work;

(C) Required cultural celebration of
activities;

(D) Compulsory privilege or bias
recognition exercises;

(E) Prescribed protocols for discussing
group identity;

(F) Required acceptance of specific power
dynamic analysis.

HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727
(iii) Integrates into academic subjects:

(A) Mandatory emotional processing
activities;

(B) Required identity-based analysis;

(C) Compulsory cultural competency
exercises;

(D) Prescribed social justice framework;

(E) Required equity-based learning methods.

(b) Nothing in the Wyoming Educational Religious
Freedom Act shall be interpreted to prohibit:

(i) An educational institution from providing
academic instruction about historical or scientific
concepts;

(ii) A student from voluntarily participating in
discussions or activities;
HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727

(iii) An educational institution from using
educational materials that reference diverse viewpoints or
perspectives.

21-9-305. Responsibilities of educational
institutions.

(a) Educational institutions shall perform the
following duties:

(i) Establish written policies and procedures
to:

(A) Annually review and evaluate
curriculum, materials and instructional practices for
sectarian content including:

(I) Instructional materials including
physical and digital textbooks, interactive digital
platforms, educational software and applications, online
learning management systems and streaming media content;

HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727
(II) Supplementary materials including
worksheets, handouts, digital supplemental content,
third-party educational resources, educational websites and
platforms and virtual or augmented reality content;

(III) Teacher resources including
lesson plans, guides, instructional support materials,
classroom management tools, assessment guidelines and
digital teaching platforms;

(IV) Assessment materials including
tests, quizzes, performance evaluations, digital assessment
platforms, progress monitoring tools and data collection
systems;

(V) Professional development materials
including training materials, continuing education
resources, online professional learning platforms, coaching
and mentoring materials and educational research materials.

(B) Ensure all curriculum materials do not:

HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727
(I) Mandate acceptance of specific
belief systems;

(II) Require participation in
sectarian practices;

(III) Enforce particular worldviews;

(IV) Implement compulsory
identity-based activities.

(ii) Implement corrective action plans imposed
by the state board of education pursuant to W.S. 21-9-306.

21-9-306. Responsibilities of the state board of
education; complaint process; penalties for violation.

(a) The state board of education shall:

(i) Establish standards for educational
institutions to identify violations of W.S. 21-9-304;

HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727
(ii) Establish procedures for educational
institutions to annually submit compliance reports to the
state board for review;

(iii) Review educational institutions' policies
and procedures established under W.S. 21-9-305(a)(i);

(iv) Issue guidance to educational institutions
to ensure compliance with the Wyoming Educational Religious
Freedom Act.

(b) The state board of education shall establish
procedures to investigate complaints of noncompliance by
educational institutions with the Wyoming Educational
Religious Freedom Act. The process shall include written
notice to educational institutions of non-compliance with
the Wyoming Educational Religious Freedom Act and
imposition of corrective action plans which shall include
the following penalties:

(i) For an educational institution's first
violation the educational institution shall submit a
corrective action plan to the state board of education
HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727
within thirty (30) days of issuance of the state board's
decision, complete mandatory compliance training, provide a
monthly progress report to the state board of education for
a twelve (12) month period and be subject to a twelve (12)
month monitoring period by the state board of education;

(ii) If an educational institution violates the
Wyoming Educational Religious Freedom Act during the twelve
(12) month monitoring period imposed under paragraph (i) of
this subsection, the educational institution shall:

(A) Be subject to a change in accreditation
status to accredited with follow-up by the state board of
education pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(ii) and (b)(ii);

(B) Be subject to weekly compliance
monitoring and reporting by the state board of education;

(C) Submit curriculum all curriculum
materials to the department of education for review. The
department of education shall complete the review within
forty-five (45) days of receipt of the material and submit
HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727
written findings and recommendations to the school district
board of trustees and the state board of education;

(D) Submit an administrative improvement
plan to the state board of education; and

(E) Be subject to an additional twelve (12)
months of monitoring by the state board of education.

(iii) If an educational institution violates the
Wyoming Educational Religious Freedom Act twice during the
twelve (12) month monitoring period imposed under paragraph
(i) of this subsection, the educational institution shall:

(A) Be subject to a change in accreditation
status to non-accredited by the state board of education
pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(ii) and (b)(ii);

(B) Be subject to oversight and corrective
measures, including but not limited to a comprehensive
program review, by the state department of education and
state board of education; and

HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727
(C) Undergo leadership restructuring as
required by the state department of education and state
board of education.

(iv) Immediate action by the state board of
education to change the educational institution's
accreditation status to nonaccredited pursuant to W.S.
21-2-304(a)(ii) and (b)(ii), for any educational
institution that commits any of the following:

(A) Willfully violates the Wyoming
Educational Religious Freedom Act affecting at least twenty
percent (20%) of the students enrolled in the educational
institution for not less than ninety (90) days;

(B) Deliberately conceals violations of the
Wyoming Educational Religious Freedom Act for not less than
one hundred eighty (180) days;

(C) Engages in retaliation against the
person that alleged violation of the Wyoming Educational
Religious Freedom Act;

HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727
(D) Continued violation of the Wyoming
Educational Freedom Act for at least sixty (60) days
following receipt of the notice provided pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section;

(E) Intentional falsification of compliance
reports submitted to the state board of education;

(F) Sustained non-cooperation with
investigations conducted by the state board of education
for not less than ninety (90) calendar days.

(c) Any parent or guardian of a student enrolled in
an educational institution may:

(i) File a complaint and request a hearing with
the state board of education alleging an educational
institution violated the Wyoming Educational Religious
Freedom Act;

(ii) Request the state board of education review
educational materials of an educational institution for
HB0335

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0727
compliance with the Wyoming Educational Religious Freedom
Act.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0335